Vermont, session 2025-2026, H560.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. § 4662 is amended to read:
§ 4662. CYBERSECURITY ADVISORY COUNCIL
(a) Creation. There is created the Cybersecurity Advisory Council to
advise on the State’s cybersecurity infrastructure, best practices,
communications protocols, standards, training, and safeguards.
(b) Membership. The Council shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) the Chief Information Officer, who shall serve as the Chair or
appoint a designee from the Council to serve as the Chair;
VT LEG #386254 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.560
2026 Page 2 of 3
(2) the Chief Information Security Officer;
(3) a representative from a distribution or transmission utility, appointed
by the Commissioner of Public Service;
(4) a representative from a State municipal water system, appointed by
the Secretary of Natural Resources;
(5) a representative from a Vermont hospital, appointed by the President
of the Vermont Association of Hospitals and Health Systems;
(6) a person representing a Vermont business related to an essential
supply chain, appointed by the Chair of the Vermont Business Roundtable;
(7) the Director of Vermont Emergency Management or designee;
(8) the Governor’s Homeland Security Advisor or designee;
(9) the Vermont Adjutant General or designee;
(10) the Attorney General or designee; and
(11) the President of Vermont Information Technology Leaders or
designee;
(12) the Chair of the House Committee on Energy and Digital
Infrastructure;
(13) the Chair of the Senate Committee on Institutions; and
(14) a representative from the Judiciary, appointed by the Chief Justice
of the Supreme Court.
* * *
VT LEG #386254 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.560
2026 Page 3 of 3
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386254 v.1